Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 540A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 540A. A. Any operator of a motor vehicle who has
received a visual and audible signal, a flashing red light, flashing
red and blue lights, flashing blue and white lights, or any other
combination of flashing red, blue, and white lights, and a siren
from a peace officer driving a motor vehicle showing the same to be
an official police, sheriff, highway patrol or state game ranger
vehicle directing the operator to bring the vehicle to a stop and
who willfully increases the speed or extinguishes the lights of the
vehicle in an attempt to elude such peace officer, or willfully
attempts in any other manner to elude the peace officer, or who does
elude such peace officer, is guilty of a misdemeanor. The peace
officer, while attempting to stop a violator of this section, may
communicate a request for the assistance of other peace officers
from any office, department or agency. Any peace officer within
this state having knowledge of such request is authorized to render
such assistance in stopping the violator and may effect an arrest
under this section upon probable cause. Violation of this
subsection shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by

not more than one (1) year imprisonment in the county jail, or by a
fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than
Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment. A second or subsequent violation of this subsection
shall be punishable by not more than one (1) year in the county
jail, or by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00)
nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or both such fine
and imprisonment.
B. Any person who violates the provisions of subsection A of
this section in such manner as to endanger any other person shall be
deemed guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment in the State
Penitentiary custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of
not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or by a
fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
C. 1. Any person who causes an accident, while eluding or
attempting to elude an officer, resulting in great bodily injury to
any other person while driving or operating a motor vehicle within
this state and who is in violation of the provisions of subsection A
of this section may be charged with a violation of the provisions of
this subsection. Any person who is convicted of a violation of the
provisions of this subsection shall be deemed guilty of a felony
punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional institution the
custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than one (1)
year and not more than five (5) years, and a fine of not more than
Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).
2. As used in this subsection, “great bodily injury” means
bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which
causes serious, permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or
impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1993 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 13th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1993 Page 3